Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF95.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1769YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 95 Section 1. Section 462A.12, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. No person shall operate on the waters of this state 3 under the jurisdiction of the commission any vessel displaying 4 or reflecting a blue light or flashing blue light unless such 5 vessel is an authorized emergency vessel. 6